Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 4. Administrative Provisions

§ 1131.
Administrative improvements.

For the purpose of improving the family development programs administered by the departments within the Agency of Human Services, including the Reach Up program, the Secretary shall:

design and implement a quality assurance function for the case management component of the Reach Up program to ensure that appropriate services are being provided to families enrolled in the program;

continue to improve caseload and expenditure forecasting for all social welfare programs; and

develop standards and procedures for the training, including diversity education, of qualified case managers in the Reach Up program.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2001.

§ 1132.
Notice and appeal.

A participant may appeal the provisions of a family development plan in accordance with

3 V.S.A. § 3091

. The Commissioner shall provide notice to each participant of the standards and procedures applicable to such appeals. All federal and Agency of Human Services rules regarding conciliation, notice, hearing, and appeal shall be followed in connection with such appeals.

A participant shall receive notice and an opportunity for conciliation, hearing, and appeal in accordance with all applicable federal and Agency of Human Services rules before Reach Up sanctions are applied to the participant.

A participant shall continue to receive financial assistance payments pending appeal to the Human Services Board of Reach Up sanctions if the appeal is received prior to the effective date of the proposed sanctions.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2001.

§ 1133.
Transition to other programs.

The Department shall transfer the family to Reach Up, a separate State program, or a solely State-funded program established under chapter 11 of this title if, after four months of receiving support in Reach First or sooner at the Department’s discretion, a family is assessed as needing ongoing financial assistance and the family is financially eligible for Reach Up, a separate State program, or a solely State-funded program established under chapter 11 of this title, unless the family chooses not to participate.

If a family finds employment meeting or exceeding the work requirements for Reach Up for the family’s size and composition, but is financially eligible for Reach Up, the Department shall transfer the family to Reach Up, unless the family chooses not to participate. A family transferring from Reach First to Reach Up shall be treated as a recipient for the purposes of income calculation.

If a family finds employment meeting or exceeding the work requirements for Reach Up for the family’s size and composition, is not financially eligible for Reach Up, and is eligible for the Reach Ahead program, the Department shall transfer the family to Reach Ahead, unless the family chooses not to participate. A family transferring from Reach Up to Reach Ahead shall be treated as a recipient for the purposes of income calculation.

A family transferring to another program under subsections (a) through (c) of this section shall not be required to complete a new application. Verification of income or other required documentation may be required as provided for by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. November 1, 2000; amended

2007, No. 30

, § 16, eff. May 17, 2007;

2009, No. 67

(Adj. Sess.), § 94, eff. Feb. 25, 2010;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 1134.
Program evaluation.

On or before January 31 of each year, the Commissioner shall design and implement procedures to evaluate, measure, and report to the Governor and the General Assembly the Department’s progress in achieving the goals of the programs provided for in sections 1002, 1102, and 1202 of this title. The report shall include:

the types of barriers facing Reach Up families seeking economic self-sufficiency, the number of families with each type of barrier, the frequency of occurrence of each type of barrier, and how support services and incentives assist in overcoming barriers;

documentation of participant results, including specific information relating to the number of persons employed, by occupation, industry, and wage; the types of subsidized and unsubsidized jobs secured by participants; any available information about results for children who have participated in the programs, including objective measures of improved conditions; the number of participating families involved in training programs; and whether the support services and incentives assist in keeping families employed;

data about the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program participation of households who have left the programs during the last fiscal year, including the number of households, adults, and children participating in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program three months after leaving the applicable program, broken down by reason for termination or leaving, and the Department’s plan to identify and assist eligible households to apply for Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits;

data about the enrollment of individuals who have left the programs during the last fiscal year in a Health Care Assistance Program, including the number of adults and children enrolled in a Health Care Assistance Program three months after leaving the applicable program, broken down by reason for termination or leaving, and the Department’s plan to identify and assist eligible households to apply for health care assistance;

a summary of all interim and final reports submitted by independent evaluation contractors to the Agency or the Department relating to the programs;

a description of the work participation rates, including the method of calculating the caseload reduction credit, for the most recent federal fiscal year;

a description of the current basic needs budget and housing allowance, the current maximum grant amounts, and the basic needs budget and housing allowance adjusted to reflect an annual cost-of-living increase;

a description of the families, during the last fiscal year, that included an adult family member receiving financial assistance for 60 or more months in his or her lifetime, including:

the number of families and the types of barriers facing these families; and

the number of families that became ineligible for the Reach Up program pursuant to subsection 1108(a) of this title, and the types of income and financial assistance received by those families that did not return to the Reach Up program within 90 days of becoming ineligible; and

a description of the families in the postsecondary education program pursuant to section 1122 of this title, including the number of participating families and any barriers to their further participation.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2001; amended

2003, No. 19

, § 22, eff. May 6, 2003;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 84;

2007, No. 30

, § 17, eff. May 17, 2007;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. May 20, 2014;

2015, No. 11

, § 35;

2015, No. 58

, § E.323.1;

2015, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § E.323.1.